New York, session 2025-2026, S4171.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative findings and declaration. The legislature 2 hereby finds and declares that New York state spends more money per 3 student than any other state in the nation, but ranks thirty-ninth in 4 high school graduation rates. Only seventy-three percent of New York's 5 students graduate from high school and only thirty-seven percent are 6 college ready. The legislature finds that New York students are not 7 adequately prepared to compete in the global economy and that changes 8 must be made to the education system in order to reverse these statis- 9 tics and prepare students to compete in the global economy. The legisla- 10 ture also finds and declares that New York has struggled for several 11 decades with the ongoing process of reorganizing our school district 12 system in a way that provides a solution to the negative effects of 13 declining school enrollment, broadens the scope of program offerings, 14 facilitates optimum class scheduling, increases professional resources, 15 and alleviates heavy tax burdens. The legislature therefore directs the 16 commissioner of education to reorganize the school districts in a manner 17 that adequately addresses the shortcomings of the current education 18 system and prepares each and every student to excel in today's global 19 economy. 20 § 2. The commissioner of the New York state department of education 21 shall establish and implement a new school district system statewide 22 consisting of one school district per county in each of the state's 23 sixty-two counties. The resulting sixty-two school districts shall EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07755-01-5 S. 4171 2 1 service only the needs of students residing in such county. Provided, 2 however, that any school district located in a city with a population of 3 one million or more shall be exempt from the provisions of this act. 4 § 3. Within one year of the effective date of this act the commission- 5 er of the New York state department of education shall submit a report 6 proposing implementing legislation to effect and fund the consolidation 7 of school districts as proposed in this act. Such report shall be 8 provided to the governor, the speaker of the assembly, the temporary 9 president of the senate, the assembly minority leader, the senate minor- 10 ity leader and the chairpersons and ranking members of the senate and 11 assembly committees on education. 12 § 4. Article 33 of title II of the education law is REPEALED. 13 § 5. Article 35 of title II of the education law is REPEALED. 14 § 6. Article 37 of title II of the education law is REPEALED. 15 § 7. Article 39 of title II of the education law is REPEALED. 16 § 8. Article 51 of title II of the education law is REPEALED. 17 § 9. Article 52 of title II of the education law is REPEALED. 18 § 10. Article 53 of title II of the education law is REPEALED. 19 § 11. This act shall take effect on the three hundred sixty-fifth day 20 after it shall have become a law.